Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-188
Valley.

The county of Valley is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township seventeen, north, of range sixteen, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township seventeen, north, of range thirteen, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty, north, of range thirteen, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty, north, of range sixteen, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 52, p. 222;

R.S.1913, § 903;

C.S.1922, § 805;

C.S.1929, § 25-192;

R.S.1943, § 22-188.